Washington statutes.
RCW 18.235.070

Previous denial, revocation, or suspension of license.

The department shall not issue a license to any person whose license has been previously denied, revoked, or suspended by the disciplinary authority for that profession or business, except in conformity with the terms and conditions of the certificate or order of denial, revocation, or suspension, or in conformity with any order of reinstatement issued by the disciplinary authority, or in accordance with the final judgment in any proceeding for review instituted under this chapter.

[ 2002 c 86 s 108.]